Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 1. Homicide

Cross references. —

As to aggravated assault and battery on pregnant woman, see §

6-2-502

.

As to civil action for wrongful death when the death shall have been caused under such circumstances as amounts in law to murder in the first or second degree or manslaughter, see §

1-38-101

.

For provision that felonious taking of life precludes inheritance or insurance benefits, see §

2-14-101

.

As to penalty if death results from willful destruction, etc., of railroad tracks or fixtures, see §

37-12-103

.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Wyoming Fetal Rights—Why the Abortion “Albatross” Is a Bird of a Different Color: The Case for Fetal-Federalism,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 627 (1993).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Corporation's criminal liability for homicide, 45 ALR4th 1021.

Homicide: cremation of victim's body as violation of accused's rights, 70 ALR4th 1091.

Homicide: liability where death immediately results from treatment or mistreatment of injury inflicted by defendant, 50 ALR5th 467.

§ 6-2-101.
Murder in the first degree; penalty.

Whoever purposely and with premeditated malice, or in the perpetration of, or attempt to perpetrate, any sexual assault, sexual abuse of a minor, arson, robbery, burglary, escape, resisting arrest, kidnapping or abuse of a child under the age of sixteen (16) years, kills any human being is guilty of murder in the first degree.

A person convicted of murder in the first degree shall be punished by death, life imprisonment without parole or life imprisonment according to law, except that a person convicted of murder in the first degree who was under the age of eighteen (18) years at the time of the offense shall be punished by life imprisonment.

A person convicted of murder in the first degree in a case in which the state seeks the death penalty shall be sentenced in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

6-2-102

. In all other cases, including any case in which the state has determined not to seek the death penalty at any stage of the proceeding, the judge shall determine the sentence of life imprisonment without parole or life imprisonment taking into consideration any negotiated plea agreement and any evidence relevant to a determination of sentence which the court deems to have probative value.

A person is guilty of murder in the first degree of an unborn child, punishable as provided for other convictions of murder in the first degree, if:

The person purposely and with premeditated malice, or in the perpetration of, or attempt to perpetrate, any sexual assault, sexual abuse of a minor, arson, robbery, burglary, escape, resisting arrest, kidnapping or abuse of a child under the age of sixteen (16) years, kills or attempts to kill any human being;

The human being was pregnant with an unborn child; and

The unborn child dies as a result of the person’s actions.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1989, ch. 171, § 1; 1994, ch. 22, § 1; 2001, ch. 96, § 2; 2004, ch. 29, § 1; 2007, ch. 159, § 2; 2013 ch. 18, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2021 ch. 116, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cited in

Osborne v. State, 2012 WY 123,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Sept 13, 2012); Chapman v. State, 2013 WY 57,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(May 10, 2013); Cloud v. State, 2014 WY 113,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Sept. 10, 2014); Nicodemus v. Lampert, 2014 WY 135,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Oct. 30, 2014).

Cross references. —

As to commutation of a death sentence once it has been commuted to a sentence of life imprisonment without parole, see §

7-13-807

.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (b), substituted “eighteen (18) years ” for “sixteen (16) years.”

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, inserted “sexual abuse of a minor” in (a).

The 2013 amendment

, effective July 1, 2013, rewrote (b).

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added (d).

Applicability. —

Laws 2004, ch. 29, § 2, provides: “The penalty of death shall not be imposed in a case pending on or after the effective date of this act, involving a crime committed prior to the effective date of this act, if the murder was committed before the defendant attained the age of eighteen (18) years.”

I. General Consideration.

II. Purpose, Premeditation and Malice.

III. Felony Murder.

§ 6-2-102.
Presentence hearing for murder in the first degree; mitigating and aggravating circumstances; effect of error in hearing.

Upon conviction of a person for murder in the first degree in a case in which the state seeks the death penalty, the judge shall conduct a separate sentencing hearing to determine whether the defendant should be sentenced to death, life imprisonment without parole or life imprisonment. The hearing shall be conducted before the judge alone if:

The defendant was convicted by a judge sitting without a jury;

The defendant has pled guilty; or

The defendant waives a jury with respect to the sentence.

In all other cases the sentencing hearing shall be conducted before the jury which determined the defendant’s guilt or, if the judge for good cause shown discharges that jury, with a new jury impaneled for that purpose. The jury shall be instructed that if the jury does not unanimously determine that the defendant should be sentenced to death, then the defendant shall be sentenced to life imprisonment without parole or life imprisonment.

The judge or jury shall hear evidence as to any matter that the court deems relevant to a determination of the sentence, and shall include matters relating to any of the aggravating or mitigating circumstances enumerated in subsections (h) and (j) of this section. Any evidence which the court deems to have probative value may be received regardless of its admissibility under the exclusionary rules of evidence, provided the defendant is accorded a fair opportunity to rebut any hearsay statements, and provided further that only such evidence in aggravation as the state has made known to the defendant or his counsel prior to his trial shall be admissible.

Upon conclusion of the evidence and arguments the judge shall give the jury appropriate instructions, including instructions as to any aggravating or mitigating circumstances, as defined in subsections (h) and (j) of this section, or proceed as provided by paragraph (iii) of this subsection:

After hearing all the evidence, the jury shall deliberate and render a sentence based upon the following:

Whether one (1) or more aggravating circumstances exist beyond a reasonable doubt as set forth in subsection (h) of this section;

Whether, by a preponderance of the evidence, mitigating circumstances exist as set forth in subsection (j) of this section; and

The mere number of aggravating or mitigating circumstances found shall have no independent significance.

The jury shall consider aggravating and mitigating circumstances unanimously found to exist, and each individual juror may also consider any mitigating circumstances found by that juror to exist. If the jury reports unanimous agreement to impose the sentence of death, the court shall discharge the jury and shall impose the sentence of death. If the jury is unable to reach a unanimous verdict imposing the sentence of death within a reasonable time, the court shall instruct the jury to determine by a unanimous vote whether the penalty of life imprisonment without parole shall be imposed. If the jury is unable to reach a unanimous verdict imposing the penalty of life imprisonment without parole within a reasonable time, the court shall discharge the jury and impose the sentence of life imprisonment;

In nonjury cases, the judge shall determine if any aggravating or mitigating circumstances exist and impose sentence within the limits prescribed by law, based upon the considerations enumerated in subparagraphs (A), (B) and (C) of paragraph (i) of this subsection.

The death penalty shall not be imposed unless at least one (1) of the aggravating circumstances set forth in subsection (h) of this section is found. In nonjury cases the judge shall make such designation. The jury, if its verdict is a sentence of death, shall designate in writing signed by the foreman of the jury:

The aggravating circumstance or circumstances which it unanimously found beyond a reasonable doubt;

The mitigating circumstance or circumstances which it unanimously found by a preponderance of the evidence; and

The mitigating circumstance or circumstances which any individual juror found by a preponderance of the evidence.

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 96, § 3.

If the trial court is reversed on appeal because of error only in the presentence hearing, the new trial which may be ordered shall apply only to the issue of punishment.

Aggravating circumstances are limited to the following:

The murder was committed by a person:

Confined in a jail or correctional facility;

On parole or on probation for a felony;

After escaping detention or incarceration; or

Released on bail pending appeal of his conviction.

The defendant was previously convicted of another murder in the first degree or a felony involving the use or threat of violence to the person;

The defendant knowingly created a great risk of death to two (2) or more persons;

The murder was committed while the defendant was engaged, or was an accomplice, in the commission of, or an attempt to commit, or flight after committing or attempting to commit, any aircraft piracy or the unlawful throwing, placing or discharging of a destructive device or bomb;

The murder was committed for the purpose of avoiding or preventing a lawful arrest or effecting an escape from custody;

The murder was committed for compensation, the collection of insurance benefits or other similar pecuniary gain;

The murder was especially atrocious or cruel, being unnecessarily torturous to the victim;

The murder of a judicial officer, former judicial officer, district attorney, former district attorney, defending attorney, peace officer, juror or witness, during or because of the exercise of his official duty or because of the victim’s former or present official status;

The defendant knew or reasonably should have known the victim was less than seventeen (17) years of age or older than sixty-five (65) years of age;

The defendant knew or reasonably should have known the victim was especially vulnerable due to significant mental or physical disability;

The defendant poses a substantial and continuing threat of future dangerousness or is likely to commit continued acts of criminal violence;

The defendant killed another human being purposely and with premeditated malice and while engaged in, or as an accomplice in the commission of, or an attempt to commit, or flight after committing or attempting to commit, any robbery, sexual assault, arson, burglary, kidnapping or abuse of a child under the age of sixteen (16) years.

Mitigating circumstances shall include the following:

The defendant has no significant history of prior criminal activity;

The murder was committed while the defendant was under the influence of extreme mental or emotional disturbance;

The victim was a participant in the defendant’s conduct or consented to the act;

The defendant was an accomplice in a murder committed by another person and his participation in the homicidal act was relatively minor;

The defendant acted under extreme duress or under the substantial domination of another person;

The capacity of the defendant to appreciate the criminality of his conduct or to conform his conduct to the requirements of law was substantially impaired;

The age of the defendant at the time of the crime;

Any other fact or circumstance of the defendant’s character or prior record or matter surrounding his offense which serves to mitigate his culpability.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1989, ch. 171, § 1; 1999, ch. 134, § 1; 2001, ch. 96, §§ 2, 3; ch. 98, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to sentence and judgment generally, see Rule 33, W.R. Cr. P.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Many of the cases below were decided under prior law.

Constitutionality. —

The death penalty provisions as set forth in this section and §

6-2-103

are not unconstitutional on their face. Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981), cert. denied, 455 U.S. 922, 102 S. Ct. 1280, 71 L. Ed. 2d 463, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 698 (U.S. 1982).

The Wyoming death penalty provisions are constitutional. Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 464 U.S. 908, 104 S. Ct. 262, 78 L. Ed. 2d 246 (U.S. 1983); Hopkinson v. Shillinger, 645 F. Supp. 374, 1986 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 21918 (D. Wyo. 1986), aff'd in part, 866 F.2d 1185,

1989 U.S. App. LEXIS 613

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1989).

The Wyoming death penalty provisions are not unconstitutional; they do not usurp the supervisory and rule-making power of the supreme court nor expand its jurisdiction in violation of the Wyoming constitution. Osborn v. State, 672 P.2d 777,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 376

(Wyo. 1983), cert. denied, 465 U.S. 1051, 104 S. Ct. 1331, 79 L. Ed. 2d 726, 1984 U.S. LEXIS 194 (U.S. 1984).

Wyoming's death penalty statute is a constitutional, weighing statute, despite the absence of weighing language, because the Wyoming statute permits the sentencer to consider only those aggravating circumstances enumerated in the statute and does not permit the jury to consider nonstatutory aggravating evidence as aggravating circumstances. Olsen v. State, 2003 WY 46, 67 P.3d 536,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2003).

Each defendant sentenced separately. —

Each specific individual convicted of a capital offense must be separately dealt with in the decision to impose the death penalty; leniency in one case does not invalidate the death penalty in others. Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 464 U.S. 908, 104 S. Ct. 262, 78 L. Ed. 2d 246 (U.S. 1983).

To justify death penalty for one who does not do actual killing,

there must be present an intent that a killing will take place or that lethal force will be employed. Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 464 U.S. 908, 104 S. Ct. 262, 78 L. Ed. 2d 246 (U.S. 1983).

Instruction on defendant's due process rights not necessary. —

An instruction in a death penalty case, requiring the jury to determine that the defendant's constitutionally guaranteed right to due process of law has been adequately protected throughout the course of the proceedings, is not necessary. Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 464 U.S. 908, 104 S. Ct. 262, 78 L. Ed. 2d 246 (U.S. 1983).

Defendant cannot challenge death penalty provisions where he is given life sentence.

See Alberts v. State, 642 P.2d 447,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 315

(Wyo. 1982).

Jury right upon retrial after remand. —

After an appeal and remand for new sentencing trial, if the previous conviction had been by jury, then there must now be a sentencing trial with a new jury impaneled for that purpose, unless the defendant exercises his right to waive a jury in the resentencing phase. Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 464 U.S. 908, 104 S. Ct. 262, 78 L. Ed. 2d 246 (U.S. 1983).

Appellate review of finding of aggravating circumstances. —

All aggravating circumstances are, on review, measured as to the sufficiency of the evidence beyond a reasonable doubt according to the standard set by

Jackson v. Virginia,

443 U.S. 307, 99 S. Ct. 2781, 61 L. Ed. 2d 560, 1979 U.S. LEXIS 10 (1979). The question is whether after viewing the evidence in the light most favorable to the prosecution, any rational trier of fact could have found the essential elements beyond a reasonable doubt. Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 464 U.S. 908, 104 S. Ct. 262, 78 L. Ed. 2d 246 (U.S. 1983).

Underlying felony not used as aggravating factor. —

Where an underlying felony is used to convict a defendant of felony murder only, elements of the underlying felony may not again be used as an aggravating factor in the sentencing phase.
Engberg v. Meyer, 820 P.2d 70,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1991) (decided under facts existing prior to 1989 amendment) (overruling Engberg v. State).

Use of underlying felony where defendant convicted of first-degree murder. —

Where defendant, charged with committing premeditated first-degree murder and felony murder, was convicted of both, the court properly instructed the jury that it could consider that defendant was engaged in a robbery when deciding whether or not to impose the death penalty. Olsen v. State, 2003 WY 46, 67 P.3d 536,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2003).

Previous convictions within subsection (h)(ii) may occur contemporaneously in same prosecution

in which the death penalty is recommended by the jury. Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981), cert. denied, 455 U.S. 922, 102 S. Ct. 1280, 71 L. Ed. 2d 463, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 698 (U.S. 1982).

Unnecessarily torturous. —

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-102

has eliminated the use of “heinous” and limited those first degree murders deserving the death penalty to those “especially atrocious and cruel, being unnecessarily torturous to the victim.” The language is not unconstitutionally vague. Plainly the second phrase describes the first phrase and is deliberately joined to mean that the murder is “especially atrocious and cruel” because it is “unnecessarily torturous to the victim.” Torture is established as a core element of this particular aggravating factor; strictly construed, the standard set by this aggravating fact will be met by those murders which are accompanied by intentionally inflicted torture, either physical or mental, distinguishable from the usual, the ordinary, the normal sort of homicide in the typical murder case. Olsen v. State, 2003 WY 46, 67 P.3d 536,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2003).

To prevent lawful arrest. —

Sufficient evidence supported the finding that the aggravating circumstance of committing murder for the purpose of avoiding lawful arrest existed where the defendant stated that none of the victims resisted him during the robbery and the robbery was accomplished before he shot them, and that he shot the victims because they could identify him. Olsen v. State, 2003 WY 46, 67 P.3d 536,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2003).

“Heinous” murder. —

A murder, to be classified as heinous under subsection (h)(vii), must demonstrate that the consciencelessness of the defendant is not only an outrage but also a dangerous and unrestrainable threat to society. Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981), cert. denied, 455 U.S. 922, 102 S. Ct. 1280, 71 L. Ed. 2d 463, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 698 (U.S. 1982).

“Atrocious” and “cruel.” —

To be classified as “atrocious” and “cruel” under subsection (h)(vii), a murder must be a conscienceless or pitiless crime which is unnecessarily torturous to the victim. Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981), cert. denied, 455 U.S. 922, 102 S. Ct. 1280, 71 L. Ed. 2d 463, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 698 (U.S. 1982).

Great risk of harm to others. —

The court improperly applied the aggravating factor of knowingly creating a great risk of death to two or more persons where the State did not present any evidence or suggest that there were other bystanders involved who were threatened with grave harm as defendant shot his intended victims while committing a bar robbery; the statute shows no evidence of a legislative intent that all multiple homicides be subject to the death penalty. Olsen v. State, 2003 WY 46, 67 P.3d 536,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2003).

“Extreme mental or emotional disturbance.” —

Mental distress, depression, suicidal tendencies, along with previous alcohol and drug abuse, can hardly be considered to be “extreme,” as required by paragraph (j)(ii), such as to mitigate the seriousness of the crime; these reasons cannot excuse the defendant from the death penalty, where they seem to be the result of the sort of life the defendant has elected to lead. Osborn v. State, 672 P.2d 777,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 376

(Wyo. 1983), cert. denied, 465 U.S. 1051, 104 S. Ct. 1331, 79 L. Ed. 2d 726, 1984 U.S. LEXIS 194 (U.S. 1984).

Consideration of mitigating factors. —

In the appellate review process, it must be apparent that the jury, through the verdict form, considered any constitutionally relevant mitigating evidence; in the selection phase, the sentencer may not be precluded from considering, and may not refuse to consider, any constitutionally relevant mitigating evidence. Olsen v. State, 2003 WY 46, 67 P.3d 536,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2003).

Inadmissibility of victim impact statements in death penalty cases. —

Neither the Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-102

death penalty statute nor Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

7-21-101

through 103 general victim impact statutes authorize the introduction of victim impact evidence during capital sentencing, and the trial court errs in allowing its introduction; such error, however, is subject to harmless error analysis. Olsen v. State, 2003 WY 46, 67 P.3d 536,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2003).

Jury is free to consider mitigating factors other than those specifically enumerated

in subsection (j). Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981), cert. denied, 455 U.S. 922, 102 S. Ct. 1280, 71 L. Ed. 2d 463, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 698 (U.S. 1982).

Mitigating circumstances need not be found unanimously. —

The jury must be told by the trial court in a death sentence case that mitigating circumstances need not be found unanimously by the jury, but that mitigating circumstances may be found by individual jurors and weighed by them individually in deciding the life or death question. Engberg v. Meyer, 820 P.2d 70,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1991) (decided under facts existing prior to 1989 amendment).

Erroneous jury instructions. —

Where in a capital murder case the jury received inconsistent instruction in the steps of the statutory process it was to engage in and no useful instruction in how it was to engage in this statutory process, the case was remanded. Olsen v. State, 2003 WY 46, 67 P.3d 536,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2003).

District judge had no jurisdiction to reduce death sentence, supported by sufficient evidence,

to life imprisonment under Rule 35, W.R.Cr.P., because to have done so would have been in direct conflict with the legislative mandate of this section. Hopkinson v. State, 704 P.2d 1323,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 542

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 474 U.S. 1026, 106 S. Ct. 582, 88 L. Ed. 2d 564, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 4837 (U.S. 1985).

Stated

in

Small v. State, 689 P.2d 420,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 342

(Wyo. 1984).

Cited

in

Turner v. State, 624 P.2d 774,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 300

(Wyo. 1981); Osborn v. Schillinger, 639 F. Supp. 610, 1986 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 23167 (D. Wyo. 1986); Harlow v. State, 2003 WY 69, — P.3d —,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. May 29, 2003).

Law reviews. —

See article, “The Evolution of Capital Punishment in Wyoming: A Reconciliation of Social Retribution and Humane Concern?” XIII Land & Water L. Rev. 865 (1978).

For article, “The Greatest Lawyer in the World (The Maturing of Janice Walker),” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 135 (1979).

For case note, “Is the Current Test of the Constitutionality of Capital Punishment Proper? Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981), cert. denied, 455 U.S. 922, 102 S. Ct. 1280, 71 L. Ed. 2d 463, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 698 (1982),” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 681 (1982).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For case note, “Constitutional Law — Double Jeopardy
—
The New Role of Double Jeopardy in Capital Sentencing. Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 743 (1984).

For comment, “Reforming Criminal Sentencing in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 575 (1985).

For case note, “Constitutional Law — Does the New Death Qualification Standard Ensure a Biased Jury? Wainwright v. Witt, 469 U.S. 412, 83 L. Ed. 2d 841, 105 S. Ct. 844, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 43 (1985),” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 579 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Propriety of imposition of death sentence by state court following jury's recommendation of life imprisonment or lesser sentence, 8 ALR4th 1028.

Admissibility of expert or opinion testimony on battered wife or battered woman syndrome, 18 ALR4th 1153.

Homicide: physician's withdrawal of life supports from comatose patient, 47 ALR4th 18.

Admissibility of expert testimony as to appropriate punishment for convicted defendant, 47 ALR4th 1069.

Sufficiency of evidence, for purposes of death penalty, to establish statutory aggravating circumstance that murder was heinous, cruel, depraved or the like — post-Gregg cases, 63 ALR4th 478.

Sufficiency of evidence, for purposes of death penalty, to establish statutory aggravating circumstance that murder was committed to avoid arrest or prosecution, to effect escape from custody, to hinder governmental function or enforcement of law and the like — post-Gregg cases, 64 ALR4th 755.

Sufficiency of evidence, for purposes of death penalty, to establish statutory aggravating circumstance that in committing murder, defendant created risk of death or injury to more than one person, to many persons and the like — post-Gregg cases, 64 ALR4th 837.

Sufficiency of evidence, for purposes of death penalty, to establish statutory aggravating circumstance that defendant was previously convicted of or committed other violent offense, had history of violent conduct, posed continuing threat to society and the like — post-Gregg cases, 65 ALR4th 838.

Sufficiency of evidence, for purposes of death penalty, to establish statutory aggravating circumstance that murder was committed for pecuniary gain, as consideration or in expectation of receiving something of monetary value and the like — post-Gregg cases, 66 ALR4th 417.

Sufficiency of evidence, for death penalty purposes, to establish statutory aggravating circumstance that murder was committed in course of committing, attempting or fleeing from other offense, and the like — post-Gregg cases, 67 ALR4th 887.

Sufficiency of evidence, for purposes of death penalty, to establish statutory aggravating circumstance that defendant committed murder while under sentence of imprisonment, in confinement or correctional custody, and the like — post-Gregg cases, 67 ALR4th 942.

Validity and construction of “extreme indifference” murder statute, 7 ALR5th 758.

Admissibility of evidence in homicide case that victim was threatened by one other than defendant, 11 ALR5th 831.

Propriety, under federal constitution, of evidence or argument concerning deterrent effect of death penalty, 78 ALR Fed 553.

What constitutes unusually “vulnerable” victim under sentencing guideline § 3A1.1 permitting increase in offense level, 114 ALR Fed 355.

Propriety of carrying out death sentences against mentally ill individual, 111 ALR5th 491.

§ 6-2-103.
Review of death sentences; notice from clerk of trial court; factors to be considered by supreme court; disposition of appeal.

The judgment of conviction and sentence of death is subject to automatic review by the supreme court of Wyoming within one hundred twenty (120) days after certification by the sentencing court of the entire record, unless the time is extended for an additional period not to exceed sixty (60) days by the supreme court for good cause shown. Such review by the supreme court shall have priority over all other cases.

Within ten (10) days after receiving the transcript, the clerk of the trial court shall transmit the entire record and transcript to the supreme court of Wyoming together with a notice prepared by the clerk and a report prepared by the trial judge. The notice shall set forth the title and docket number of the case, the name of the defendant and the name and address of his attorney, a statement of the judgment, the crime and punishment prescribed. The report shall be in the form of a standard questionnaire prepared and supplied by the supreme court of Wyoming.

The supreme court of Wyoming shall consider the punishment as well as any errors enumerated by way of appeal.

With regard to the sentence, the court shall determine if:

The sentence of death was imposed under the influence of passion, prejudice or any other arbitrary factor;

The evidence supports the jury’s or judge’s finding of an aggravating circumstance as enumerated in W.S.

6-2-102

and mitigating circumstances.

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 171, § 2.

In addition to its authority regarding correction of errors, the court, with regard to review of death sentences, may:

Affirm the sentence of death;

Set the sentence aside and impose a sentence of life imprisonment without parole, or life imprisonment; or

Set the sentence aside and remand the case for resentencing.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1989, ch. 171, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 96, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to stay of execution and relief pending appeal, see Rule 5.01, W.R.A.P.

Constitutionality. —

The death penalty provisions as set forth in §

6-2-102

and this section are not unconstitutional on their face. Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981), cert. denied, 455 U.S. 922, 102 S. Ct. 1280, 71 L. Ed. 2d 463, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 698 (U.S. 1982).

The Wyoming death penalty provisions are not unconstitutional; they do not usurp the supervisory and rule-making power of the supreme court nor expand its jurisdiction in violation of the Wyoming constitution. Osborn v. State, 672 P.2d 777,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 376

(Wyo. 1983), cert. denied, 465 U.S. 1051, 104 S. Ct. 1331, 79 L. Ed. 2d 726, 1984 U.S. LEXIS 194 (U.S. 1984).

Limitation of considerations in postconviction proceedingsnot unconstitutional because of this section. —

Limiting capital defendant's post-conviction relief to non-sentencing matters did not deny him his Eight Amendment right to be free from cruel and unusual punishment. Every criminal defendant has the right to address any and all sentencing issues in his or her direct appeal, including the question of cruel and unusual punishment. This section specifically directs the state supreme court to consider sentencing issues in the automatic review of capital sentences, and the inmate received the benefit of just such a review in his direct appeal. Harlow v. State, 2005 WY 12, 105 P.3d 1049,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 546 U.S. 835, 126 S. Ct. 63, 163 L. Ed. 2d 90, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 6229 (U.S. 2005).

Automatic supreme court review. —

Wyoming Supreme Court customarily considers the requirements imposed by
Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-103

in death penalty cases even when review is sought by the defendant and that review is not simply the automatic review contemplated by
§

6-2-103

.Harlow v. State, 2003 WY 47, 70 P.3d 179,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. May 20, 2003), cert. denied, 540 U.S. 970, 124 S. Ct. 438, 157 L. Ed. 2d 317, 2003 U.S. LEXIS 7776 (U.S. 2003).

Speculation. —

To hold that a defendant's death sentence is disproportionate to the defendant's codefendants' life sentences would require an appeals court to speculate about the aggravating circumstances and the mitigating circumstances that may have been determined in order to make the codefendants' situations truly analogous to the defendant's; an appeals court cannot engage in speculation as to facts not presented in the record. Harlow v. State, 2003 WY 47, 70 P.3d 179,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 2003), reh'g denied,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. May 20, 2003), cert. denied, 540 U.S. 970, 124 S. Ct. 438, 157 L. Ed. 2d 317, 2003 U.S. LEXIS 7776 (U.S. 2003).

Appellate review of finding of aggravating circumstances. —

All aggravating circumstances are, on review, measured as to the sufficiency of the evidence beyond a reasonable doubt according to the standard set by

Jackson v. Virginia,

443 U.S. 307, 99 S. Ct. 2781, 61 L. Ed. 2d 560, 1979 U.S. LEXIS 10 (1979). The question is whether, after viewing the evidence in the light most favorable to the prosecution, any rational trier of fact could have found the essential elements beyond a reasonable doubt. Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 464 U.S. 908, 104 S. Ct. 262, 78 L. Ed. 2d 246 (U.S. 1983).

Death penalty imposed for felony murder during armed robberynot excessive or disproportionate. —

See Engberg v. State, 686 P.2d 541,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 301

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 469 U.S. 1077, 105 S. Ct. 577, 83 L. Ed. 2d 516, 1984 U.S. LEXIS 4708 (U.S. 1984).

Accomplices in crime need not be sentenced alike,

as a sentence should be patterned to the individual defendant. Leniency in one case does not invalidate the death penalty in others. Osborn v. State, 672 P.2d 777,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 376

(Wyo. 1983), cert. denied, 465 U.S. 1051, 104 S. Ct. 1331, 79 L. Ed. 2d 726, 1984 U.S. LEXIS 194 (U.S. 1984).

Quoted

in

Hopkinson v. State, 704 P.2d 1323,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 542

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

Turner v. State, 624 P.2d 774,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 300

(Wyo. 1981).

Law reviews. —

See article, “The Evolution of Capital Punishment in Wyoming: A Reconciliation of Social Retribution and Humane Concern?” XIII Land & Water L. Rev. 865 (1978).

For case note, “Is the Current Test of the Constitutionality of Capital Punishment Proper? Hopkinson v. State, 632 P.2d 79,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 357

(Wyo. 1981), cert. denied, 455 U.S. 922, 102 S. Ct. 1280, 71 L. Ed. 2d 463, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 698 (1982),” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 681 (1982).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For case note, “Constitutional Law — Double Jeopardy
—
The New Role of Double Jeopardy in Capital Sentencing. Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 743 (1984).

For comment, “Reforming Criminal Sentencing in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 575 (1985).

§ 6-2-104.
Murder in the second degree; penalty.

Except as provided in W.S.

6-2-109

, whoever purposely and maliciously, but without premeditation, kills any human being is guilty of murder in the second degree, and shall be imprisoned in the penitentiary for any term not less than twenty (20) years, or during life.

A person is guilty of murder in the second degree of an unborn child if:

The person purposely and maliciously, but without premeditation, kills or attempts to kill any human being;

The human being was pregnant with an unborn child; and

The unborn child dies as a result of the person’s actions.

A person guilty of murder in the second degree of an unborn child shall be imprisoned in the penitentiary for any term not less than twenty (20) years, or during life.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 2010, ch. 54, § 2; 2021 ch. 116, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added “Except as provided in W.S.

6-2-109

.”

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, designated the existing provision as (a); and added (b) and (c).

I. General Consideration.

II. Purpose.

III. Malice.